New Jersey, session 221, A358.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person licensed to practice law in this State who validates an affidavit, acknowledgment, proof, oath, or affirmation taken before him in accordance with the provisions of chapter 14 of Title 46 of the Revised Statutes or R.S.41:2-1 may, but shall not be required to, affix a seal to the document indicating that he is an attorney-at-law of the State of New Jersey and, as such, is authorized by statute to perform such validations. b.  A county clerk or deputy county clerk who validates an affidavit,  acknowledgment, proof, oath, or affirmation taken before him in accordance with the provisions of chapter 14 of Title 46 of the Revised Statutes or R.S.41:2-1 may, but shall not be required to, affix a seal to the document indicating that he is a county clerk or a deputy county clerk of the State of New Jersey and, as such, is authorized by statute to perform such validations. c.     Validation of an affidavit, acknowledgment, proof, oath, or affirmation by an attorney-at-law pursuant to subsection a. of this section or by a county clerk or a deputy county clerk pursuant to subsection b. of this section shall have the same force and effect as validation and the affixing of a seal by a notary public. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.